trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="S__adu">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-mă</l>
          <r>mă<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-te</l>
          <r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-l</l>
          <r>îl<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-o</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ne</l>
          <r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-vă</l>
          <r>vă<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i</l>
          <r>îi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-le</l>
          <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-mi</l>
          <r>îmi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-mi</l>
          <r>îmi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>        </p>
        <par n="S__aducându-mi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ți</l>
          <r>îți<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ți</l>
          <r>îți<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>        </p>
        <par n="S__aducându-ți"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i</l>
          <r>îi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i</l>
          <r>îi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>        </p>
        <par n="S__aducându-i"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ne</l>
          <r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ni</l>
          <r>ni<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>        </p>
        <par n="S__aducându-ni"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-vă</l>
          <r>vă<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-vi</l>
          <r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>        </p>
        <par n="S__aducându-vi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-le</l>
          <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-li</l>
          <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>        </p>
        <par n="S__aducându-li"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<!--PARADIGMA RELATIUS-->
     <pardef n="care__rel">
      
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l></l>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>  
     
     <pardef n="căr/uia__rel">  
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>uia</l>
          <r>uia<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eia</l>
          <r>uia<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ora</l>
          <r>uia<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ora</l>
          <r>uia<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>  

     <pardef n="căr/ui__rel">  
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ui</l>
          <r>ui<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ei</l>
          <r>ui<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>or</l>
          <r>ui<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>or</l>
          <r>ui<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>  
     
      
    <pardef n="fapt_care__rel">
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
      
    <pardef n="fapt_pentru_care__rel">
      
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
      
 
 <pardef n="unde__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
 
 <pardef n="câ/t__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tă</l>
          <r>t<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ți</l>
          <r>t<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   </pardef>
 <pardef n="ce/l_care__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l<b/>care</l>
          <r>l<b/>care<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lui<b/>care</l>
          <r>l<b/>care<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a<b/>care</l>
          <r>l<b/>care<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lei<b/>care</l>
          <r>l<b/>care<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i<b/>care</l>
          <r>l<b/>care<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lor<b/>care</l>
          <r>l<b/>care<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="dg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>le<b/>care</l>
          <r>l<b/>care<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lor<b/>care</l>
          <r>l<b/>care<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     
    </pardef>


</pardefs>

 <e lm="care">
        <i>care</i>
        <par n="care__rel"/>
      </e>
 <e lm="pe_care" r="LR">
        <i>pe<b/>care</i>
        <par n="care__rel"/>
      </e>
 <e lm="căruia">
        <i>căr</i>
        <par n="căr/uia__rel"/>
      </e>
<e lm="cărui">
        <i>căr</i>
        <par n="căr/ui__rel"/>
      </e>
 <e lm="cel_care">
        <i>ce</i>
	<par n="ce/l_care__rel"/>
	</e>
 <e lm="fapt_care">
        <i>fapt<b/>care</i>
        <par n="fapt_care__rel"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="fapt_pentru_care">
        <i>fapt<b/>pentru<b/>care</i>
        <par n="fapt_care__rel"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="drept_care" r="LR">
        <i>drept<b/>care</i>
        <par n="fapt_care__rel"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ceea_ce">
        <i>ceea<b/>ce</i>
        <par n="fapt_care__rel"/>
      </e>
 <e lm="unde">
        <i>unde</i>
	<par n="unde__rel"/>
	</e>
	<e lm="cât">
        <i>câ</i>
	<par n="câ/t__rel"/>
	</e>
	<e lm="când">
        <i>când</i>
	<par n="unde__rel"/>
	</e>
	<e lm="care">
        <i>care</i>
	<par n="unde__rel"/>
	</e>
